District of Columbia statutes.
1-151

District of Columbia official flag.

The flag of the District of Columbia shall be 3 red stars in the upper portion of the flag (the chief), with 2 red horizontal bars on a field of white. All proportions described in this section are expressed in relation to the flag’s vertical dimension (the hoist). The chief shall be 3 /10 of the hoist, the horizontal red bars shall be 2 /10 , the base and white space between the 2 bars shall be 2 /10 and 1 /10 , respectively. The red stars shall be 2 /10 in diameter, and shall be spaced equidistant in the fly. The length of the fly shall depend on the proportions of the flag upon which this design may be displayed.

History

Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-237, § 2, 49 DCR 10485

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-152.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-171.